Texas statutes.
ELECTION CODE

TITLE 13. RECOUNTS

CHAPTER 216. AUTOMATIC RECOUNT

Sec. 216.001. APPLICABILITY OF CHAPTER. This chapter applies only to an election that results in a tie vote as provided by Sections 2.002(i), 2.023(b) and (c), and 2.028.

Added by Acts 2001, 77th Leg., ch. 851, Sec. 3, eff. Sept. 1, 2001. Amended by Acts 2003, 78th Leg., ch. 652, Sec. 4, eff. Sept. 1, 2003.

Sec. 216.002. CONDUCT OF AUTOMATIC RECOUNT GENERALLY. Except as otherwise provided by this chapter, this title, including the notice requirement of Section 213.009, applies to a recount conducted under this chapter with appropriate modifications as prescribed by the secretary of state.

Added by Acts 2001, 77th Leg., ch. 851, Sec. 3, eff. Sept. 1, 2001.

Amended by:

Acts 2011, 82nd Leg., R.S., Ch. 1164 (H.B. 2817), Sec. 38, eff. September 1, 2011.

Sec. 216.003. INITIATING AUTOMATIC RECOUNT. For purposes of initiating an automatic recount, the authority designated under Section 212.026 shall order the recount.

Added by Acts 2001, 77th Leg., ch. 851, Sec. 3, eff. Sept. 1, 2001.

Amended by:

Acts 2021, 87th Leg., R.S., Ch. 711 (H.B. 3107), Sec. 95, eff. September 1, 2021.

Sec. 216.004. COUNTING PROCEDURES. The method of counting votes in an automatic recount is the same method of counting used in the election that resulted in the tie vote.

Added by Acts 2001, 77th Leg., ch. 851, Sec. 3, eff. Sept. 1, 2001.

Sec. 216.005. COST OF AUTOMATIC RECOUNT. (a) Subchapter E, Chapter 212, does not apply to an automatic recount.

(b) The costs of an automatic recount shall be paid by each political subdivision or county executive committee, as applicable, served by a presiding officer designated under Section 213.001.

Added by Acts 2001, 77th Leg., ch. 851, Sec. 3, eff. Sept. 1, 2001.